Utah statutes.
41-1a-514.   Certificate of title -- Contents.

(1)  The division upon approving an application for a certificate of title shall issue a certificate of title.  The face of the certificate of title shall include:

(a)  the date issued;

(b)  the name and address of the owner;

(c)  a description of the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor titled, including the year, make, and identification number;

(d)  a statement of the owner's title and of one lien or encumbrance, if any, upon the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor;

(e)  any brand on the title; and

(f)  an odometer statement, if applicable.

(2)  The certificate of title shall bear the seal of the division.

(3)  The certificate of title shall contain adequate space for:

(a)  the assignment and warranty of title or interest by the owner;

(b)  the release of interest by a recorded lien holder; and

(c)  the notation of one lien or encumbrance, if any, existing at the time of transfer.

(4)  The model year that is listed on the certificate of title of a replica vehicle shall be the model year that the body of the vehicle resembles.

(5)  The certificate of title of a replica vehicle shall indicate that the vehicle is a replica vehicle.



Amended by Chapter 171, 2009 General Session

